Washington statutes.
RCW 10.40.060

Pleading to arraignment.

In answer to the arraignment, the defendant may move to set aside the indictment or information, or he or she may demur or plead to it, and is entitled to one day after arraignment in which to answer thereto if he or she demands it.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1039; 1891 c 28 s 50; Code 1881 s 1045; RRS s 2098.]